Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIX Provisional Remedies, Enforcement of Judgments, and Exemptions
General Provisions

425.001.
Exemption of surety on specified bonds.

No surety shall be required on any bond made for the purpose of the issuance of a temporary restraining order, writ of possession, or order of attachment pursuant to this chapter by any domestic bank, savings and loan institution, or institution which is a member of the Farm Credit System, as defined by 12 U.S.C. Section 2002.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 135, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

425.005.
Procedure for arrest of defendant in civil action. [Repealed.]

425.006.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

The term “judicial officer” means any judge or any commissioner or other officer appointed by the trial court to perform the duties required by this chapter.

The term “probable validity of the claim” means a claim in which it is more likely than not that the plaintiff will obtain a judgment against the defendant on that claim.

The term “dwelling” as used in this chapter means a mobile home, boat or similar property used as a place of residence.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 91, § 1.

425.010.
Issuance of order of arrest — Contents of affidavit. [Repealed.]